Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in this section and sections 2 and 4a of this 2022 Act:
(1) “Agricultural worker” means an individual who performs services in  agriculture for
an employer in exchange for an agreed remuneration or rate of pay.
(2) “Agriculture” includes:
(a) Farming in all its branches, including the cultivation and tillage of the soil;
(b) Dairying;
(c) The production, cultivation, growing  and harvesting of any agricultural or
horticultural commodities;
(d) The raising of livestock, bees, fur-bearing animals or poultry; and
(e) Any  other practices performed by a farmer or on a farm as an incident to or in con-
junction with farming operations, including preparation for market, delivery to  storage or
to market, or delivery to carriers for transportation to market.
(3) “Salary” has the meaning given that term in ORS 653.010.
(4) “Workweek” means a fixed period of time established by  an employer that reflects a
regularly recurring period of 168 hours or seven consecutive 24-hour periods.
SECTION 2.
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an employer  may not
permit, require or suffer an agricultural worker to work a total number of hours in  excess
of:
(a) For calendar years 2023 and 2024, 55 hours in one workweek.
(b) For calendar years 2025 and 2026, 48 hours in one workweek.
(c) For calendar year 2027 and each year thereafter, 40 hours in one workweek.
(2) An employer may permit, require or suffer an agricultural worker to work more  than
the maximum allowable hours in one workweek provided  under subsection (1) of this section
if the employer compensates the agricultural worker at one and  one-half times the worker’s
regular rate  of pay for each overtime hour or portion of an hour that the worker works in
excess of the maximum allowable hours.
(3)(a) For purposes of this section, a workweek may begin on any day of the week  and
at any hour of the day and need not coincide with a calendar week.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-B) Page 1
(b) An employer may change  the beginning of an agricultural worker’s workweek if the
change is intended to be permanent and is not designed to evade overtime requirements.
(4) A claim for a violation of this section may be made under ORS 653.055.
SECTION 3.
 Section 2 of this 2022 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 2. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an employer may  not permit,
require or suffer an agricultural worker to work a total number of hours in excess of[ :]
[(a) For calendar years 2023 and 2024, 55 hours in one workweek. ]
[(b) For calendar years 2025 and 2026, 48 hours in one workweek. ]
[(c) For calendar year 2027 and each year thereafter, ] 40 hours in one workweek.
(2) An employer may permit, require or suffer an agricultural worker to work  more than [ the
maximum allowable ] 40 hours in one workweek [ provided under subsection (1) of this section ] if the
employer compensates the agricultural worker at one and one-half times the worker’s  regular rate
of pay for each overtime hour or portion of an hour that the worker works in  excess of [ the maxi-
mum allowable] 40 hours.
(3)(a) For purposes of this section, a workweek may begin on any day of  the week and at any
hour of the day and need not coincide with a calendar week.
(b) An employer may  change the beginning of an agricultural worker’s workweek if the change
is intended to be permanent and is not designed to evade overtime requirements.
(4) A claim for a violation of this section may be made under ORS 653.055.
SECTION 4.
The amendments to section 2 of this 2022 Act by section 3 of this 2022 Act
become operative on January 1, 2027.
SECTION 4a. The provisions of section 2 of this 2022 Act relating to overtime  compen-
sation requirements for agricultural workers do not apply to:
(1) An individual described in ORS 653.020 (1).
(2) An individual employed in agriculture whose principal duties  are administrative,
executive or professional work and who:
(a) Performs predominantly intellectual, managerial or creative tasks;
(b) Exercises discretion and independent judgment; and
(c) Earns a salary and is paid on a salary basis.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 653.055 is amended to read:
653.055. (1) Any employer who pays an employee  less than the wages to which the employee is
entitled under ORS 653.010 to 653.261 or section 2 of this 2022 Act  is liable to the employee af-
fected:
(a) For the full amount of the wages, less any  amount actually paid to the employee by the
employer; and
(b) For civil penalties provided in ORS 652.150.
(2) Any agreement between  an employee and an employer to work at less than the wage rate
required by ORS 653.010 to 653.261 or section 2 of this 2022 Act  is no defense to an action under
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries has  the same powers and duties in
connection with a wage claim based on ORS 653.010 to 653.261 and section 2 of this 2022 Act  as
the commissioner has under ORS 652.310 to 652.445 and in addition  the commissioner may, without
the necessity of assignments of wage claims  from employees, initiate suits against employers to en-
join future failures to pay required minimum wages or  overtime pay and to require the payment of
minimum wages and  overtime pay due employees but not paid as of the time of the filing of suit.
The commissioner may join in a single proceeding and in one cause of suit any number of wage
claims against the same employer. If the commissioner does not prevail in such action, the commis-
sioner shall pay all costs and disbursements from the Bureau of Labor and Industries Account.
(4) The court may award reasonable attorney fees  to the prevailing party in any action brought
by an employee under this section.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 653.256 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-B) Page 2
653.256. (1) In addition to  any other penalty provided by law, the Commissioner of the Bureau
of Labor and Industries may assess a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000  against any person that
willfully violates ORS 653.025, 653.030, 653.045, 653.050, 653.060, 653.261, 653.265, 653.606,  653.611,
653.616, 653.621, 653.626, 653.631 or 653.636 or section 5, chapter 537, Oregon Laws 2015, or section
2 of this 2022 Act  or any rule adopted thereunder.
(2) In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the commissioner may assess a civil  pen-
alty not to exceed $1,000 against any person that intentionally violates ORS 653.077 or  any rule
adopted thereunder.
(3) Civil penalties authorized by this section shall be imposed in the manner provided  in ORS
183.745.
(4)(a) All sums collected as penalties under this section shall be first applied toward  re-
imbursement of costs incurred in determining the violations,  conducting hearings under this section
and addressing and collecting the penalties.
(b) The remainder, if any, of the sums collected as penalties  under subsection (1) of this section
shall be paid over by the commissioner to the Department of  State Lands for the benefit of the
Common School Fund of this state. The department shall issue a receipt  for the money to the com-
missioner.
(c) The remainder, if any, of the sums collected as penalties under  subsection (2) of this section
shall be paid over by the commissioner to the Department of Human Services for the benefit of  the
Breastfeeding Mother Friendly Employer Project. The department shall  issue a receipt for the
moneys to the commissioner.
SECTION 6a. (1) No later than November 30, 2026, and every six years thereafter,  the
Employment Department, in consultation with the Bureau of Labor and Industries, the  De-
partment of Revenue and the State Department of Agriculture, shall  submit a report, in the
manner provided in ORS 192.245, to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to agriculture, on the identified  economic impacts of the overtime compensation re-
quirements under section 2 of this 2022 Act.
(2) The report must consider all available relevant data related to the  overtime compen-
sation requirements under section 2 of this 2022 Act for calendar years 2023, 2024, 2025 and
2026 and must include, but need not be limited to, an examination of the following:
(a) Employment, wages and hours worked  by agricultural workers whose employment is
subject to ORS chapter 657.
(b) The total amount of wages paid to  agricultural workers whose employment is subject
to ORS chapter 657.
(c) Employment, wages and hours worked in the agricultural sector  by quarter, including
job vacancies available in natural resources, by quarter.
(d) Employment, wages and hours worked, separated by size  of employer and agricultural
sector.
(e) Recent national and regional trends related to the agricultural workforce, including
wages, employment and labor costs.
SECTION 6b.
The division of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services that
serves as the office of economic  analysis shall include in the economic forecast for a
biennium any available relevant economic and wage data that relates to  the agricultural
economy in this state as impacted by the operation of sections 2 and 8 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 6c. No later  than September 30, 2022, the State Department of Agriculture and
the Oregon Business  Development Department shall make recommendations for legislation
to a regular  or interim committee of the Legislative Assembly related to agriculture re-
garding available options for establishing a grant program, loan program or lending program
to which $10 million will be allocated  for the purpose of providing financial assistance to
employers to mitigate the costs associated with compliance with the overtime  compensation
requirements under section 2 of this 2022 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-B) Page 3
SECTION 7. Sections 8 to 11 of this 2022 Act are added to and made a part of  ORS
chapter 315.
SECTION 8. (1) As used in this section and sections 9 and 10 of this 2022 Act:
(a) “Agricultural worker” has the meaning given that term in section 1 of this 2022 Act.
(b) “Eligible employer” means an  employer doing business in 2017 North American In-
dustry Classification System code 111, crop production, or code 112, animal  production and
aquaculture.
(c) “Full-time equivalent employee” means an employee or  a combination of employees
that perform at least 2,080 hours of work for an employer in a calendar year.
(2)(a) A credit  against taxes that are otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 or, if the
taxpayer is a corporation, under ORS chapter 317 or 318 is allowed  for overtime compen-
sation required under section 2 of this 2022 Act to be paid, for work performed in Oregon,
by an eligible employer to agricultural workers  on an hourly basis. The amount of the credit
shall equal a percentage of the actual excess paid to agricultural workers during the calendar
year in which the tax year begins, as determined under section 9 of this 2022 Act.
(b) A labor contractor licensed under ORS 658.410 may not claim a  credit under this
section. An eligible employer may claim  a credit under this section for wages paid to workers
recruited, solicited, supplied or employed  by a labor contractor on behalf of the eligible em-
ployer.
(c) Notwithstanding ORS 317.090 (3), a credit under this section  is allowed against the tax
imposed under ORS 317.090.
(d) A credit is not allowed under this section for any overtime wages  paid to an employee
who is exempt from the provisions of section 2 of  this 2022 Act as a member of the imme-
diate family of the employer.
(3) Prior to claiming the credit allowed under this section, a taxpayer is required to re-
ceive a  notice of acknowledgment from the Department of Revenue, as provided in section
10 of this 2022 Act, stating the maximum  amount of credit that the taxpayer may claim for
the calendar year.
(4) If the amount allowable:
(a) As a credit under this section against taxes imposed  under ORS chapter 316, when
added to the sum of the amounts allowable as payment  of tax under ORS 316.187 or 316.583,
other tax prepayment amounts  and other refundable credit amounts, exceeds the taxes im-
posed by ORS chapters 314 and 316 for the tax year after application of any nonrefundable
credits allowable for purposes of  ORS chapter 316 for the tax year, the amount of the excess
shall be refunded to the taxpayer as provided in ORS 316.502.
(b) As a credit under this section against taxes imposed  under ORS chapter 317 or 318,
when added to the sum of the amount of estimated tax  paid under ORS 314.515 and any other
tax prepayment amounts, exceeds the taxes imposed by ORS chapters 314 and  317 for the tax
year (reduced by any nonrefundable credits allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 317 for the
tax year), the amount of  the excess shall be refunded to the taxpayer as provided in ORS
314.415.
(5) Any amount that is refunded to the taxpayer under this section and  that is in excess
of the tax liability of the taxpayer does not bear interest.
(6) A  nonresident shall be allowed the credit under this section. The credit shall be
computed in the same manner and be subject to the same limitations as the credit granted
to a  resident. However, the credit shall be prorated using the proportion provided in ORS
316.117.
(7) If a change in the taxable year of the taxpayer occurs as  described in ORS 314.085,
or if the Department of Revenue terminates the  taxpayer’s taxable year under ORS 314.440,
the credit allowed under this section shall be prorated or computed in a manner consistent
with ORS 314.085.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-B) Page 4
(8) If a  change in the status of a taxpayer from resident to nonresident or from nonres-
ident to resident occurs, the credit allowed under this section shall  be determined in a
manner consistent with ORS 316.117.
(9) The  Department of Revenue shall adopt rules for the purposes of sections 8 to 11 of
this 2022 Act, including  policies and procedures for providing notice to taxpayers regarding
the credit allowed under this section as required in section 10 of this 2022 Act.
SECTION 9. (1) The amount of credit  allowed under section 8 of this 2022 Act shall be
equal to a percentage of the additional wages paid  as required overtime pay to agricultural
workers by an eligible employer,  in excess of regular pay, as set forth in subsections (2) to
(5) of this section.
(2) If during the calendar year the taxpayer employs  more than 50 full-time equivalent
employees and is not primarily engaged in the  business of dairying, the following percentages
of excess wages  paid by the employer in a calendar year shall apply, for the following calen-
dar years:
(a) 60 percent, for 2023 or 2024.
(b) 45 percent, for 2025.
(c) 30 percent, for 2026.
(d) 15 percent, for 2027 or 2028.
(3) If during the calendar year the taxpayer employs more than 25 but not more than 50
full-time equivalent employees, or  employs more than 25 full-time equivalent employees and
is primarily engaged in the business of dairying, the following percentages of excess  wages
paid by the employer in a calendar year shall apply, for the following calendar years:
(a) 75 percent, for 2023.
(b) 60 percent, for 2024 or 2025.
(c) 50 percent, for 2026, 2027 or 2028.
(4) If during the calendar year the taxpayer employs not  more than 25 full-time equiv-
alent employees and is not primarily engaged in the business of dairying, the following per-
centages of excess wages paid by the employer  in a calendar year shall apply, for the
following calendar years:
(a) 90 percent, for 2023.
(b) 80 percent, for 2024 and 2025.
(c) 60 percent, for 2026, 2027 and 2028.
(5) If during the calendar year  the taxpayer employs not more than 25 full-time equiv-
alent employees and is primarily engaged in the  business of dairying, the credit shall equal
100 percent of excess wages paid by the employer.
SECTION 10.
(1) In order to  receive a notice of acknowledgment from the Department
of Revenue in support of a tax  credit allowed under section 8 of this 2022 Act, a taxpayer
shall submit to the  department an application under this section. The application shall be
made in the form and manner prescribed by the department and  must be submitted by the
taxpayer no later than January 31 following the calendar  year for which the taxpayer seeks
credit.
(2) The taxpayer must include with the  application required under this section the fol-
lowing:
(a) The address and tax identification number of the taxpayer.
(b) A statement by the taxpayer of the overtime hours worked and  overtime wages paid,
on an  hourly basis, to agricultural workers employed by the taxpayer and the amount of
overtime wages paid by or on behalf of the taxpayer  as compensation to agricultural workers
during the calendar year. The taxpayer shall provide aggregate data as to employees  of the
taxpayer who received overtime pay from the taxpayer and those who did not.
(c) The number of the license issued under ORS 658.410 to any labor contractor  used to
recruit, solicit, supply or employ workers on behalf of the taxpayer, or  other permit or reg-
istration numbers issued to the labor contractor.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-B) Page 5
(d) If applicable, any  license required under ORS 475C.065 or 571.281 or registration re-
quired under ORS 475C.792.
(e) Any other information required by the department to verify  the identity of the tax-
payer or the potential maximum amount of credit allowed to  the taxpayer under section 8
of this 2022 Act.
(3) Upon receipt of an application under this section, the department  shall immediately
allow an extension, from the next applicable due date,  for filing of the taxpayer’s income or
corporate excise tax return.
(4) Not later than June 1 of the year in which the application under subsection (1) of  this
section is filed, the department  shall issue written notice to taxpayers that meet the appli-
cation requirements of this section. The notice of acknowledgment  shall state the maximum
amount of credit for which the taxpayer is eligible for the tax year.  The credit claimed may
not exceed the actual amount of excess paid as overtime wages to  agricultural workers
during the calendar year by the taxpayer.
SECTION 11. The total amount allowed for tax credits for overtime wages under section
8 of this 2022 Act, as acknowledged in notices  provided by the Department of Revenue under
section 10 of this 2022 Act, may not exceed  $55 million for all taxpayers for any calendar
year. If the department receives applications for the  credit sufficient to exceed this amount,
the department  shall by rule proportionately reduce the amount of certified credits among
all taxpayers applying for the credit.
SECTION 12. Section 8 of this  2022 Act applies to tax years beginning on or after January
1, 2023.
SECTION 12a. Following receipt of a report required under section 6a of this 2022 Act
and submitted to a regular or interim committee of  the Legislative Assembly, the Legislative
Assembly shall consider making adjustments to the structure of the  credit allowed under
section 8 of this  2022 Act and shall revise the credit rate amounts provided in section 9 of
this 2022 Act, if deemed appropriate by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 12b. Notwithstanding any provision of ORS 314.835 or 314.840,  the Department
of Revenue and the Bureau of Labor and Industries may share  information necessary for the
effective administration of sections 2 and 8 of this 2022 Act, for the  purpose of carrying out
the provisions of sections 2 and 8 of  this 2022 Act, provided that the department and the
bureau do not disclose personally identifiable information.
SECTION 13.  ORS 316.502 is amended to read:
316.502. (1) The net revenue  from the tax imposed by this chapter, after deducting refunds and
amounts described in ORS 285B.630 and 285C.635, shall  be paid over to the State Treasurer and held
in the General Fund as miscellaneous receipts available generally to meet  any expense or obligation
of the State of Oregon lawfully incurred.
(2) A working balance of unreceipted revenue from the  tax imposed by this chapter may be re-
tained for the payment of refunds, but such working balance shall not at the close  of any fiscal year
exceed the sum of $1 million.
(3) Moneys are continuously appropriated to the Department of Revenue to make:
(a) The refunds authorized under subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) The  refund payments in excess of tax liability authorized under ORS 315.174, 315.262, 315.264,
315.266 and 316.090 and section 3, chapter 589, Oregon  Laws 2021 , and section 8 of this 2022
Act.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 317.850 is amended to read:
317.850. (1) The net revenue from the tax imposed by  this chapter, after deduction of refunds,
shall be paid over to  the State Treasurer and held in the General Fund as miscellaneous receipts
available generally to meet any expense or obligation of the State of Oregon lawfully incurred.
(2) A working balance of  unreceipted revenue from the tax imposed by this chapter may be re-
tained for the payment of refunds, but such working balance shall not at the close  of any fiscal year
exceed the sum of $500,000.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-B) Page 6
(3) Moneys are continuously appropriated to the Department of Revenue to make:
(a) The refunds authorized under subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) The refund payments in excess of tax liability authorized under section 8 of this 2022
Act.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 314.772 is amended to read:
314.772. (1) Except as provided in ORS 314.766 (5)(b), the tax credits allowed or  allowable to a
C corporation for  purposes of ORS chapter 317 or 318 shall not be allowed to an S corporation. The
business tax credits allowed or allowable for purposes of ORS chapter 316 shall be allowed or  are
allowable to the shareholders of the S corporation.
(2) In determining the tax imposed under ORS chapter 316, as provided under ORS 314.763,  on
income of the shareholder  of an S corporation, there shall be taken into account the shareholder’s
pro rata share  of business tax credit (or item thereof) that would be allowed to the corporation (but
for subsection (1) of this section)  or recapture or recovery thereof. The credit (or item thereof), re-
capture or recovery shall be passed through to shareholders in pro rata shares as determined in  the
manner prescribed under section 1377(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) The character of any item included in a shareholder’s pro rata share  under subsection (2)
of this section shall be determined as if such item were  realized directly from the source from which
realized by the corporation, or incurred in the same manner as incurred by the corporation.
(4) If the shareholder is a nonresident and there is a requirement  applicable for the business tax
credit that in the case of a nonresident the credit be  allowed in the proportion provided in ORS
316.117, then that provision shall apply to the nonresident shareholder.
(5) As used in this section, “business tax  credit” means the following credits: ORS 315.104
(forestation and reforestation), ORS 315.138 (fish screening, by-pass  devices, fishways), ORS 315.141
(biomass production for biofuel), ORS 315.156  (crop gleaning), ORS 315.164 and 315.169 (agriculture
workforce housing), ORS 315.176 (bovine manure), ORS 315.204 (dependent care assistance),  ORS
315.208 (dependent care facilities), ORS  315.213 (contributions for child care), ORS 315.237 (employee
and dependent scholarships), ORS 315.271 (individual development accounts),  ORS 315.304 (pollution
control facility), ORS 315.326 (renewable energy development contributions),  ORS 315.331 (energy
conservation projects), ORS 315.336 (transportation projects), ORS  315.341 (renewable energy re-
source equipment manufacturing facilities), ORS 315.354 and 469B.151 (energy conservation  facili-
ties), ORS 315.506 (tribal taxes on reservation enterprise zones and reservation partnership zones),
ORS 315.507 (electronic  commerce), ORS 315.514 (film production development contributions), ORS
315.523 (employee training programs),  ORS 315.533 (low income community jobs initiative), ORS
315.593 (short line railroads), ORS 315.640 (university venture development funds), ORS 315.643
(Opportunity Grant Fund contributions), ORS 315.675 (Trust  for Cultural Development Account
contributions),  ORS  317.097 (loans for affordable housing), ORS 317.124 (long term enterprise zone
facilities), ORS 317.147 (loans for agriculture workforce housing), ORS 317.152 (qualified  research
expenses) and ORS 317.154 (alternative qualified research expenses) and section  9, chapter 774,
Oregon Laws 2013 (alternative fuel  vehicle contributions) , and section 8 of this 2022 Act (agri-
cultural overtime pay) .
SECTION 16.
 ORS 318.031 is amended to read:
318.031. It  being the intention of the Legislative Assembly that this chapter and ORS chapter
317 shall be administered as uniformly as possible (allowance  being made for the difference in im-
position of the taxes), ORS 305.140 and 305.150, ORS chapter 314 and the  following sections are in-
corporated into and made a part of this chapter: ORS 315.104, 315.141, 315.156, 315.176, 315.204,
315.208, 315.213, 315.304, 315.326, 315.331, 315.336, 315.506,  315.507, 315.523, 315.533, 315.593 and
315.643 and section 8 of this 2022 Act  (all only to the extent applicable to a corporation) and ORS
chapter  317.
SECTION 17.
This 2022 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2022
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-B) Page 7
Passed by House March 1, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 3, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4002 (HB 4002-B) Page 8